Utah statutes.
61-1-29.   Savings clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.



Amended by Chapter 284, 1983 General Session

